Utah statutes.
34A-2-108.   Void agreements between employers and employees.

(1) Except as provided in Section 34A-2-420, an agreement by an employee to waive the employee's rights to compensation under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, is not valid.

(2) An agreement by an employee to pay any portion of the premium paid by his employer is not valid.

(3)  Any employer who deducts any portion of the premium from the wages or salary of any employee entitled to the benefits of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act:

(a)  is guilty of a misdemeanor; and

(b)  shall be fined not more than $100 for each such offense.

